scripts/proclitic.script
#***** proclitic.script *****
# Th. Fransen, 16/08/19

echo >>> Opening 'proclitic.script' ...

clear stack

#\\\\\ DEFINE LEXICON /////

echo >>> Reading in 'proclitic.lexc' ...
read lexc < proclitic.lexc

echo >>> Making flag diacritics two sided ...
tfd

define LEXproclitic ;

#\\\\\ APPLY REPLACE RULES /////

set flag-is-epsilon ON

echo >>> Cleaning up initial +'s ...

# invert lexicon as replace rules target lower level, invert afterwards  
define LEX [LEXproclitic.i .o. "+" -> 0 || .#. _ ].i ;

# Orthographic rules

define vowCoalesc [
["^PRONa" -> 0 || {ní} _ ] .o. 
[Vow -> 0 ||  _ "^PRONa" ] .o. 
["^PRONa" -> a]
] ;

define consOrth [
"^M" -> m|{mm} .o.
"^N" -> n|{nn}
] ; 

define orthRules [ vowCoalesc .o. consOrth ] ;

echo >>> Applying lower-level rules ...
regex [LEX .o. orthRules] ;

set flag-is-epsilon OFF

#\\\\\ DEFINE FINAL LEXICON AS VARIABLE /////

echo >>> Defining final lexicon ...
define LEXprocl
